North Carolina statutes. Chapter 45. Mortgages and Deeds of Trust.
PART 1.
GENERAL PROVISIONS.

§ 45-21.1. Definitions; construction.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

"Resale" means a resale of real property or a resale of any leasehold interest created by a lease of real property held pursuant to

G.S. 45-21.30

.

"Sale" means a sale of real property or a sale of any leasehold interest created by a lease of real property pursuant to (i) an express power of sale contained in a mortgage, deed of trust, leasehold mortgage, or leasehold deed of trust or (ii) a "power of sale", under this Article, authorized by other statutory provisions.

The following constructions apply in this Article:

The terms "mortgage" or "deed of trust" include leasehold mortgages or leasehold deeds of trust.

The terms "mortgagee" or "trustee" include any person or entity exercising a power of sale pursuant to this Article.

The terms "real property" or "property" include any leasehold interest created by a lease of real property.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1967, c. 562, s. 2; 1991, c. 255, s. 1; 1993, c. 305, s. 1.)

Cross References.

- As to judicial sales, see

G.S. 1-339.1

et seq.

As to execution sales, see

G.S. 1-339.41

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

- For discussion of this Article, see 27 N.C.L. Rev. 479 (1949).

For comment discussing changes in North Carolina's foreclosure law, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 903 (1976).

§ 45-21.2. Article not applicable to foreclosure by court action.

This Article does not affect any right to foreclosure by action in court, and is not applicable to any such action.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1.)

Legal Periodicals.

- For comment, "Out of Luck: The Effect of the North Carolina Supreme Court's Decision in In re Lucks and its Impact on the Law of Foreclosures," see 41 Campbell L. Rev. 253 (2019).

§ 45-21.3: Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 305, s. 2, effective October 1, 1993, and applicable to instruments recorded prior to, on, or after that date.

Every sale of real property shall be held in the county where the property is situated unless the property consists of a single tract situated in two or more counties.

A sale of a single tract of real property situated in two or more counties may be held in any one of the counties in which any part of the tract is situated. As used in this section, a "single tract" means any tract which has a continuous boundary, regardless of whether parts thereof may have been acquired at different times or from different persons, or whether it may have been subdivided into other units or lots, or whether it is sold as a whole or in parts.

When a mortgage or deed of trust with power of sale of real property designates the place of sale within the county, the sale shall be held at the place so designated.

When a mortgage or deed of trust with power of sale of real property confers upon the mortgagee or trustee the right to designate the place of sale, the sale shall be held at the place designated by the notice of sale, which place shall be either on the premises to be sold or as follows:

Property situated wholly within a single county shall be sold at the courthouse door of the county in which the land is situated.

A single tract of property situated in two or more counties may be sold at the courthouse door of any one of the counties in which some part of the real property is situated.

When a mortgage or deed of trust with power of sale of real property does not designate, or confer upon the mortgagee or trustee the right to designate, the place of sale, or when it designates as the place of sale some county in which no part of the property is situated, such real property shall be sold as follows:

Property situated wholly within a single county shall be sold at the courthouse door of the county in which the land is situated.

A single tract of property situated in two or more counties may be sold at the courthouse door of any one of the counties in which some part of the real property is situated.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1975, c. 57, s. 1.)

§§ 45-21.5, 45-21.6: Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 562, s. 2.

When the property to be sold consists of separate tracts of real property situated in different counties, there shall be a separate advertisement, sale and report of sale of the property in each county. The report of sale for the property in any one county shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which such property is situated. The sale of each such tract shall be subject to separate upset bids. The clerk of the superior court of the county where the property is situated has jurisdiction with respect to upset bids of property situated within his county. To the extent the clerk deems necessary, the sale of each separate tract within his county, with respect to which an upset bid is received, shall be treated as a separate sale for the purpose of determining the procedure applicable thereto.

The exercise of the power of sale with respect to a separate tract of property in one county does not extinguish or otherwise affect the right to exercise the power of sale with respect to tracts of property in another county to satisfy the obligation secured by the mortgage or deed of trust.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1993, c. 305, s. 3.)

§ 45-21.8. Sale as a whole or in parts.

When the instrument pursuant to which a sale is to be held contains provisions with respect to whether the property therein described is to be sold as a whole or in parts, the terms of the instrument shall be complied with.

When the instrument contains no provisions with respect to whether the property therein described is to be sold as a whole or in parts, the person exercising the power of sale may, in his discretion, subject to the provisions of

G.S. 45-21.9

, sell the property as a whole or in such parts or parcels thereof as are separately described in the instrument, or he may offer the property for sale by each method and sell the property by the method which produces the highest price.

(b1)
When real property is sold in parts, the sale of any such part is subject to a separate upset bid; and, to the extent the clerk of superior court having jurisdiction deems advisable, the sale of each such part shall thereafter be treated as a separate sale for the purpose of determining the procedure applicable thereto.

This section does not affect the equitable principle of marshaling assets.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1993, c. 305, s. 4.)

§ 45-21.9. Amount to be sold when property sold in parts; sale of remainder if necessary.

When a person exercising a power of sale sells property in parts pursuant to

G.S. 45-21.8

he shall sell as many of such separately described units and parcels as in his judgment seems necessary to satisfy the obligation secured by the instrument pursuant to which the sale is being made, and the costs and expenses of the sale.

If the proceeds of a sale of only a part of the property are insufficient to satisfy the obligation secured by the instrument pursuant to which the sale is made and the costs and expenses of the sale, the person authorized to exercise the power of sale may readvertise the unsold property and may sell as many additional units or parcels thereof as in his judgment seems necessary to satisfy the remainder of the secured obligation and the costs and expenses of the sale. As to any such sale, it shall not be necessary to comply with the provisions of

G.S. 45-21.16

but the requirements of

G.S. 45-21.17

relating to notices of sale shall be complied with.

When the entire obligation has been satisfied by a sale of only a part of the property with respect to which a power of sale exists, the lien on the part of the property not so sold is discharged.

The fact that more property is sold than is necessary to satisfy the obligation secured by the instrument pursuant to which the power of sale is exercised does not affect the validity of the title of any purchaser of property at any such sale.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1975, c. 492, s. 15.)

§ 45-21.9A. Simultaneous foreclosure of two or more instruments.

When two or more mortgages or deeds of trust held by the same person are secured in whole or in part by the same property, and there are no intervening liens, except for ad valorem taxes, between such mortgages or deeds of trust, the obligations secured by such mortgages or deeds of trust may be combined and the property sold once to satisfy the combined obligations if (i) powers of sale are provided in all such instruments; (ii) there is no provision in any such instrument which would not permit such a procedure; (iii) all the terms of all such instruments requiring compliance by the lender in connection with foreclosure sales are complied with; and (iv) all requirements of this Chapter governing power of sale foreclosures are met with respect to all such instruments. The proceeds of any sale shall be applied as provided in this Chapter. As between the combined obligations being foreclosed, proceeds shall be applied in the order of priority of the instruments securing them, and any deficiencies shall be determined accordingly.

(1985, c. 515, s. 1; 1993, c. 305, s. 5.)

§ 45-21.10. Requirement of cash deposit at sale.

If a mortgage or deed of trust contains provisions with respect to a cash deposit at the sale, the terms of the instrument shall be complied with.

If the instrument contains no provision with respect to a cash deposit at the sale, the mortgagee or trustee may require the highest bidder immediately to make a cash deposit not to exceed the greater of five percent (5%) of the amount of the bid or seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

If the highest bidder fails to make the required deposit, the person holding the sale may at the same time and place immediately reoffer the property for sale.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1993, c. 305, s. 6.)

§ 45-21.11. Application of statute of limitations to serial notes.

When a series of notes maturing at different times is secured by a mortgage or deed of trust and the exercise of the power of sale for the satisfaction of one or more of the notes is barred by the statute of limitations, that fact does not bar the exercise of the power of sale for the satisfaction of indebtedness represented by other notes of the series not so barred.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1967, c. 562, s. 2.)

§ 45-21.12. Power of sale barred when foreclosure barred.

Except as provided in subsection (b), no person shall exercise any power of sale contained in any mortgage or deed of trust, or provided by statute, when an action to foreclose the mortgage or deed of trust, is barred by the statute of limitations.

If a sale pursuant to a power of sale contained in a mortgage or deed of trust, or provided by statute, is commenced within the time allowed by the statute of limitations to foreclose such mortgage or deed of trust, the sale may be completed although such completion is effected after the time when commencement of an action to foreclose would be barred by the statute. For the purpose of this section, a sale is commenced when the notice of hearing or the notice of sale is first filed, given, served, posted, or published, whichever occurs first, as provided by this Article or by the terms of the instrument pursuant to which the power of sale is being exercised.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1967, c. 562, s. 2; 1969, c. 984, s. 1; 1977, c. 359, s. 1.)

Cross References.

- As to statute of limitations on foreclosure, see

G.S. 1-47(3)

.

Legal Periodicals.

- For comment on application of statute of limitations to promise of grantee assuming mortgage or deed of trust, see 43 N.C.L. Rev. 966 (1965).

§ 45-21.12A. Power of sale barred during periods of military service.

Power of Sale Barred. - A mortgagee, trustee, or other creditor shall not exercise a power of sale contained in a mortgage or deed of trust, or provided by statute, during, or within 90 days after, a mortgagor's, trustor's, or debtor's period of military service. The clerk of court shall not conduct a hearing pursuant to G.S. 45-21.16(d) unless the mortgagee, trustee or other creditor seeking to exercise a power of sale under a mortgage or deed of trust, or provided by statute, files with the clerk a certification that the hearing will take place at a time that is not during, or within 90 days after, a period of military service for the mortgagor, trustor or debtor. This subsection applies only to mortgages and deeds of trust that originated before the mortgagor's or trustor's period of military service.

Waiver. - This section shall not apply if the mortgagor, trustor, or debtor waives his or her rights under this section pursuant to a written agreement of the parties executed during or after the mortgagor's, trustor's, or debtor's period of military service, as an instrument separate from the obligation or liability to which the waiver applies. Any waiver in writing of a right or protection provided by this section must be in at least 12 point type and shall specify the legal instrument creating the obligation or liability to which the waiver applies.

Purpose. - The purpose of this section is to supplement and complement the provisions of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. App. § 501, et seq., and to afford greater peace and security for persons in federal active duty.

Definitions. - The following definitions apply in this section:

Military service. -

In the case of a member of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard:

Active duty, as defined in 10 U.S.C. § 101(d)(1), and

In the case of a member of the National Guard, includes service under a call to active service authorized by the President or the Secretary of Defense for a period of more than 30 consecutive days under 32 U.S.C. § 502(f), for purposes of responding to a national emergency declared by the President and supported by federal funds.

In the case of a servicemember who is a commissioned officer of the Public Health Service or the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, active service, and

Any period during which a servicemember is absent from duty on account of sickness, wounds, leave, or other lawful cause.

Period of military service. - The period beginning on the date on which a servicemember enters military service and ending on the date on which the servicemember is released from military service or dies while in military service.

Servicemember. - A member of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, the commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, or the commissioned corps of the Public Health Service.

(2010-190, s. 1; 2011-183, s. 127(b).)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2010-190, s. 4, made this section effective January 1, 2011, and applicable to foreclosures initiated on or after that date.

Session Laws 2010-190, s. 1, which enacted this section, provided: "Part 2 of Article 2A of Chapter 45 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new section to read."

G.S. 45-21.12

A has instead been placed in Part 1 of Article 2A of Chapter 45 at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2011-183, s. 127(b), effective June 20, 2011, inserted "United States" in sub-subdivision (d)(1)a. and subdivision (d)(3) and capitalized the names of the branches of the armed forces immediately following that term.

§ 45-21.13: Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 562, s. 2.

Whenever any person fails to file any report or account, as provided by this Article, or files an incorrect or incomplete report or account, the clerk of the superior court having jurisdiction on his own motion or the motion of any interested party, may issue an order directing such person to file a correct and complete report or account within 20 days after service of the order on him. If such person fails to comply with the order, the clerk may issue an attachment against him for contempt, and may commit him to jail until he files such correct and complete report or account.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1.)

Cross References.

- As to preliminary report of sale of real property, see

G.S. 45-21.26

.

§ 45-21.15. Trustee's fees.

When a sale has been held, the trustee is entitled to such compensation, if any, as is stipulated in the instrument.

When no sale has actually been held, compensation for a trustee's services is determined as follows:

If no compensation for the trustee's services in holding a sale is provided for in the instrument, the trustee is not entitled to any compensation;

If compensation is specifically provided for the trustee's services when no sale is actually held, the trustee is entitled to such compensation;

If the instrument provides for compensation for the trustee's services in actually holding a sale, but does not provide compensation for the trustee's services when no sale is actually held, the trustee is entitled to compensation as follows: (i) one-fourth of the completed sale compensation before the trustee files the notice of hearing; (ii) one-half after the filing of the notice of hearing; and (iii) three-fourths after the hearing.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 305, s. 7.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1993, c. 305, s. 7.)

Legal Periodicals.

- For comment, "Out of Luck: The Effect of the North Carolina Supreme Court's Decision in In re Lucks and its Impact on the Law of Foreclosures," see 41 Campbell L. Rev. 253 (2019).

§ 45-21.4. Place of sale of real property.

§ 45-21.7. Sale of separate tracts in different counties.

§ 45-21.14. Clerk's authority to compel report or accounting; contempt proceeding.